Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2302
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the incorporation in any local political subdivision in this state of public corporations to acquire, enlarge, improve, expand, own, lease, and dispose of properties to the end that such corporations may be able to promote industry, develop trade, and further the use of the agricultural products and natural resources of this state by inducing manufacturing, industrial, commercial, and research enterprises (1) to establish new projects in this state, (2) to enlarge and expand existing projects located in this state, or (3) to relocate, in or around the same local political subdivision in this state, projects to replace projects all or a major portion of which have been acquired for one or more public purposes by the United States of America, the State of Nebraska, or any branch, arm, agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of either, whether by purchase, through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or by other means.

It is the further intent of the Legislature to vest the corporations with all the powers that may be necessary to enable them to accomplish their purposes, except that the corporations shall not have the power of eminent domain. It is not intended that the corporations themselves be authorized to operate any such manufacturing, industrial, commercial, or research enterprise. The Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act shall be liberally construed in conformity with such intention.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 2.